src/ParadigmFeatures/PreciseDeclType/GetPreciseDeclType.foma
load stack ../../ParadigmFeatures/MorphAnimacy/GetMorphAnimacy.bin
invert net
define GetMorphAnimacy;
source ../../LetterClasses.foma
source ../../ParadigmFeatures.foma
regex %+Subst -> %+Subst2 || .#. {путь}  _ %+Masc Feature* %+Subst;
regex %+Subst -> %+Nul || .#. {соль}  _ %+Neut Feature* %+Subst;
regex %+Subst -> %+Subst1 ||  _ %+Masc Feature* %+Subst;
regex %+Subst -> %+Subst2 ||  _ %+Fem Feature* %+Subst;
turn stack
compose net
define PreciseDeclTypeRules;
define GetPreciseDeclType GetMorphAnimacy .o. PreciseDeclTypeRules;
